Maine, session 132, LD1118.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §12724 is enacted to read:
§12724. Maine Free Community College Program
The Maine Free Community College Program, referred to in this section as "the
program," is established in accordance with this section.
1. Eligibility. The system shall issue a waiver for the payment of tuition and mandatory
fees for students eligible for the program pursuant to this subsection. To be eligible for the
program, a student must:
A. Enroll in an associate degree, diploma or certificate program at a college under
section 12714;
B. Live in the State for the duration of the enrollment in a college; and
C. Accept all available federal and state grants, scholarships and other sources of
funding offered to the student;
A waiver is valid for up to twice the stated completion time for an eligible student's program
of study.
2. Report. Beginning January 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, the system shall submit
a report to the Governor and the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over education matters and the joint standing committee of the Legislature
having jurisdiction over appropriations and financial affairs on the status of the program.